Massachusetts, session 194th, S1441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 40A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended 
by adding the following paragraph:-  
(5) An inclusionary zoning ordinance or by-law that requires not more than 13 percent of 
units be affordable; provided, however, that such zoning ordinance or by-law shall not unduly 
constrain the production of housing in the area impacted by the inclusionary zoning ordinance or 
by-law; provided further, that such ordinance or by-law shall require a density bonus; and 
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable communities may issue 
guidelines or promulgate regulations consistent with this paragraph.